pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX P Y 114
SFX P   0               -o              [aeiouéê]
SFX P   ns              m-lo            ns
SFX P   s               -lo             [^ná]s
SFX P   0               -no             m
SFX P   0               -a              [aeiouéê]
SFX P   ns              m-la            ns
SFX P   s               -la             [^ná]s
SFX P   0               -na             m
SFX P   0               -os             [aeiouéê]
SFX P   ns              m-los           ns
SFX P   s               -los            [^ná]s
SFX P   0               -nos            m
SFX P   0               -as             [aeiouéê]
SFX P   ns              m-las           ns
SFX P   s               -las            [^ná]s
SFX P   0               -nas            m
SFX P   z               -lo             [iu]z
SFX P   z               -la             [iu]z
SFX P   z               -los            [iu]z
SFX P   z               -las            [iu]z
SFX P   az              á-lo            az
SFX P   az              á-la            az
SFX P   az              á-los           az
SFX P   az              á-las           az
SFX P   ez              ê-lo            ez
SFX P   ez              ê-la            ez
SFX P   ez              ê-los           ez
SFX P   ez              ê-las           ez
SFX P   ar              á-lo            ar
SFX P   ar              á-la            ar
SFX P   ar              á-los           ar
SFX P   ar              á-las           ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ei         ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ás         ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-á          ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-emos       ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-eis        ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ão         ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ia         ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ias        ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-íamos      ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-íeis       ar
SFX P   ar              á-lo-iam        ar
SFX P   er              ê-lo            er
SFX P   er              ê-la            er
SFX P   er              ê-los           er
SFX P   er              ê-las           er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ei         er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ás         er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-á          er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-emos       er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-eis        er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ão         er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ia         er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ias        er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-íamos      er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-íeis       er
SFX P   er              ê-lo-iam        er
SFX P   zer             -lo-ei          dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-ás          dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-á           dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-emos        dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-eis         dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-ão          dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-ia          dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-ias         dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-íamos       dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-íeis        dizer
SFX P   zer             -lo-iam         dizer
SFX P   azer            á-lo            azer
SFX P   azer            á-la            azer
SFX P   azer            á-los           azer
SFX P   azer            á-las           azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-ei         azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-ás         azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-á          azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-emos       azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-eis        azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-ão         azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-ia         azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-ias        azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-íamos      azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-íeis       azer
SFX P   azer            á-lo-iam        azer
SFX P   r               -lo             ir
SFX P   r               -la             ir
SFX P   r               -los            ir
SFX P   r               -las            ir
SFX P   r               -lo-ei          ir
SFX P   r               -lo-ás          ir
SFX P   r               -lo-á           ir
SFX P   r               -lo-emos        ir
SFX P   r               -lo-eis         ir
SFX P   r               -lo-ão          ir
SFX P   r               -lo-ia          ir
SFX P   r               -lo-ias         ir
SFX P   r               -lo-íamos       ir
SFX P   r               -lo-íeis        ir
SFX P   r               -lo-iam         ir
SFX P   r               -lo             or
SFX P   r               -la             or
SFX P   r               -los            or
SFX P   r               -las            or
SFX P   r               -lo-ei          or
SFX P   r               -lo-ás          or
SFX P   r               -lo-á           or
SFX P   r               -lo-emos        or
SFX P   r               -lo-eis         or
SFX P   r               -lo-ão          or
SFX P   r               -lo-ia          or
SFX P   r               -lo-ias         or
SFX P   r               -lo-íamos       or
SFX P   r               -lo-íeis        or
SFX P   r               -lo-iam         or

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   r               damente         [ia]r
SFX B   er              idamente        er

SFX w Y 20
SFX w   0               so              o
SFX w   0               sa              o
SFX w   0               sos             o
SFX w   0               sas             o
SFX w   a               oso             a
SFX w   a               osa             a
SFX w   a               osos            a
SFX w   a               osas            a
SFX w   ção             cioso           ção
SFX w   ção             ciosa           ção
SFX w   ção             ciosos          ção
SFX w   ção             ciosas          ção
SFX w   e               oso             e
SFX w   e               osa             e
SFX w   e               osos            e
SFX w   e               osas            e
SFX w   0               oso             [^aeiou]
SFX w   0               osa             [^aeiou]
SFX w   0               osos            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0               osas            [^aeiou]

SFX G Y 29
SFX G   o               ice             [^çgc]o
SFX G   ço              cice            ço
SFX G   go              guice           go
SFX G   co              quice           co
SFX G   a               ice             [^çgc]a
SFX G   ça              cice            ça
SFX G   ga              guice           ga
SFX G   ca              quice           ca
SFX G   e               ice             e
SFX G   0               ice             r
SFX G   0               ice             [^v][^q]l
SFX G   vel             bilice          [^áí]vel
SFX G   ável            abilice         ável
SFX G   ível            ibilice         ível
SFX G   z               cice            z
SFX G   o               ices            [^çgc]o
SFX G   ço              cices           ço
SFX G   go              guices          go
SFX G   co              quices          co
SFX G   a               ices            [^çgc]a
SFX G   ça              cices           ça
SFX G   ga              guices          ga
SFX G   ca              quices          ca
SFX G   0               ices            [^v][^q]l
SFX G   e               ices            e
SFX G   0               ices            r
SFX G   vel             bilices         [^áí]vel
SFX G   ável            abilices        ável
SFX G   ível            ibilices        ível

SFX J Y 27
SFX J   0   AC   .
SFX J   0   AL   .
SFX J   0   AP   .
SFX J   0   AM   .
SFX J   0   BA   .
SFX J   0   CE   .
SFX J   0   DF   .
SFX J   0   ES   .
SFX J   0   GO   .
SFX J   0   MA   .
SFX J   0   MT   .
SFX J   0   MS   .
SFX J   0   MG   .
SFX J   0   PA   .
SFX J   0   PB   .
SFX J   0   PR   .
SFX J   0   PE   .
SFX J   0   PI   .
SFX J   0   RJ   .
SFX J   0   RN   .
SFX J   0   RS   .
SFX J   0   RO   .
SFX J   0   RR   .
SFX J   0   SC   .
SFX J   0   SP   .
SFX J   0   SE   .
SFX J   0   TO   .

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0   -/J .
