pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
acentuar/XYPLSBcN
acicatar/XYPL
acirrar/XYPLMNnB
adequar/YPLcdvBNWIRS
aferroar/XYPLD
afinar/XYPLDMBNWcRS
afogar/XYPLDMBS
afronta/pw
agradecer/XYPLRMvB
agues/PLS
ajeitar/XYPLWBS
alegar/XYPLBcnv
aloprar/XYPLDBWcg
amargo/fplhmswG
amargurar/XYPLB
amealhar/XYPLD
América/pQ
angina/pw
angustiar/XYPLDB
antecipar/XYPLBcv
apanigueis/PL
apetite/pw
apiedar/XYPLBS
aprofundar/XYPLcMB
aproximar/XYPLDBcvR
arder/XYPLMNWn
argila/pw
arrojar/XYPLMDB
asno/pG
assolapar/XYPL
assombrar/XYPLMBcS
atabalhoar/XYPLBcM
Atlético/Qx
aura/pw
avassalar/XYPLn
avisar/XYPLDMBS
baitola/phgG
banana/phkjitwG
barbeiro/fpgG
barranco/fpw
beato/fpisG
bebericar/XYPL
bichano/fpG
bisonho/fpmG
bizarro/fplhmsG
bodega/pG
brega/phGi
brejo/pljw
brilho/plwA
brio/pw
bug/aw
bulbo/pw
bunda-mole/G!
cachorro/fplhjkG
cadenciar/XYPLB
cafona/phG
cagar/XYPLDcWé!
calhorda/pG
calibre/pw
canastra/pjkG
capacho/pljiGx
carbono/pw
careta/phjkG
carola/iGp
catarro/pw
caverna/pwh
cegar/XYPLn
cera/phw
CFM/Q
chocho/fpG
chulo/tipGf
chuva/pw
circular/XYLDBdcnR
coadjuvar/XYPLcn
comedem/PLS
compassar/XYPLBS
comprovar/XYPLcDnBv
conceito/plwU
condoem/PL
conhecer/XYPLDMBNWvSU
conjuntar/XYPLBMS
consolar/XYPLDBcvS
contenção/pwU
contraordenar/XYPLc
controlar/XYPLBNWvSU
corroeres/PL
coruja/phjkG
CREA/Q
CRF/Q
criança/phjksGAx
CRM/Q
culpa/pw
cumprir/XYPLDMBSU
cursar/XYPLvé
custo/pw
CUT/Q
dano/pw
declarar/XYPLDBcnvUéí
decoro/pw
dedicar/XYPLcDB
deleite/pw
deliberar/XYPLDBcnv
demorar/XYPLBN
DEM/xQ
deras/PL
desalmar/XYPLMB
descuidar/XYPLB
desejo/pw
desencavar/XYPL
desenvolver/XYPLDBnué
designar/XYPLDBcERU
desmazelar/XYPLB
despeito/pw
despejar/XYPLMDB
desperdiçar/XYPLD
deteriam/PL
determinar/XYPLDBcnvIU
Detran/Q
disciplinar/XYPLDMBcnvI
diva/phw
divertir/YPLMNWB
DPE/JQ
duplicar/XYPLcDnvB
emborrachar/XYPLM
empoderar/XYPLDBMNWcS
empurrar/XYPLMD
encostar/XYPLDMWS
engordar/XYPLDMW
engrenar/XYPLBgS
entornar/XYPLD
entusiasmar/XYPLBNWnv
enxaqueca/phw
equacionar/XYPLMR
esbaforir/XYPLB
escurecer/XYPLMDv
esforçar/XYPLDBNWE
espaço/pljw
esplendor/pw
esporrar/XYPL
esquisito/fplhjkmsG
estarrecer/XYPLDMB
esturricar/XYPL
exagerar/XYPLcBDNW
extinguir/YXPLDví
faceiro/fplhsG
falta/phjkw
fanfarra/pjkG
fantasia/pwt
fausto/fpwI
fermento/pw
fibra/phw
fidalgo/pflhG
figurar/XYPLDMBcnvS
flagrar/XYPLn
fofura/phG
folha/phjkgw
forçar/XYPLDMBNWc
fresar/XYPLDg
gabola/pG
gaiato/fpG
gatuno/fpimgG
gelatina/pw
gordura/phw
gostoso/fplhjkmsG
graduar/XYPLDMBcOSé
grafar/XYPL
helenizar/XYPLcn
idiota/phimGA
impeçam/PL
indenizar/XYPLcDv
indignar/XYPLBNWcn
instruí/PL
integrar/XYPLDBNWcvRSé
intrigar/XYPLn
irritar/XYPLDNWBcv
jeca/pG
jumento/fplhG
lacuna/pw
lancinar/XYPLn
latino/pftidG
lenho/pw
lerdo/fplhjkmG
lixo/fplhjkw
loiro/fplhjksG
lustro/pw
macaco/fplhjkG
macerar/XYPLDMc
maluco/fplhjkG
manifestar/XYPLcDnB
mantinha/PL
matreiro/pGf
MDB/xQ
MD/xQ
melodizar/XYPL
membrana/pw
merecer/XYPLMBNWS
mesmo/pfmdsG
miguxo/fplhG
modular/pdXYPLDBcng
moemos/PL
moleque/plhG
montanha/pwit
moreno/fplhG
MP/aJQ
MPF/Q
MPT/Q
multiplexar/XYPLDcg
negro/fplhjksG
nojo/Glp
OAB/aQ
obstinar/XYPLBc
obtêm/PL
odor/pwA
oligopolizar/XYPLc
pachola/pG
panaca/phjkG
parelhar/XYPL
pateta/ipGF
pavor/pw
PCB/xQ
PCdoB/xQ
PC/J
PCO/xQ
PDT/xQ
pelado/fplhjksGx
perceber/XYPLMBvS
perfumar/XYPLDNWcn
perrengue/pG
peste/phw
pinto/pljw
plugar/XYPLS
PL/xQ
PM/aJQx
PMDB/xQ
PME/pJ
PMN/xQ
poliamor/pw
porco/fplhjkmG
portento/pw
PPS/xQ
PP/xQ
precificar/XYPLcRu
premeditar/XYPLBcI
preverão/PL
Procon/aQ
PRTB/xQ
PSB/xQ
PSDB/xQ
PSD/xQ
PSOL/xQ
PSTU/xQ
PTB/xQ
PT/xAQ
PUC/JQ
puritano/fpiG
puseram/PL
PV/xQ
queixa/pw
ranheta/phG
recolher/XYPLMB
Rede/xQ
regular/XYPLDBMNWcvgSU
relar/XYPL
remela/pw
resplendor/w
restaurar/XYPLDcvnéí
resumir/XYPLDBW
revistamos/PL
rocha/phw
rouco/pfmlhG
sabujo/fpiG
SD/xQ
Sebrae/Q
seda/pw
sediar/XYPLMnv
selecionar/XYPLDBvES
sem-vergonha/G
SESP/Q
sobrestimar/XYPL
sofrer/XYPLDMBNWví
sonso/fpmG
SSP/Q
subordinar/XYPLDBNWcnvI
suplementar/pXYPLc
suspiro/plw
tacanho/fpmG
TCE/aQ
TC/Qa
teimosia/pG
temor/pwS
TJD/Q
TJ/JQa
tongo/fplhG
topar/XYPL
tormento/pw
traquina/pgG
TRE/Qp
treva/phw
TRF/Qa
trouxeram/PL
TRT/Qa
tucano/fplhGxA
UF/*J
urina/pw
ventura/pwS
vê/PL
vergonha/phG
viado/plhjgG!
vimos/PL
visto/pljw
vociferar/XYPLBDcn
vulto/pw
